District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.35

Freedom of Information Act requests.

Nothing in this part shall limit or restrict any right of access or disclosure that any person may have under subchapter II of Chapter 5 of Title 2 (“Freedom of Information Act”). Section 4-1303.06 shall not provide a basis for denying any request under the Freedom of Information Act for any public record pertaining to a child fatality or near fatality.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IIIA, § 335
as added Feb. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-69, § 2(b), 48 DCR 11072
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see section 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-6, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2479).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-191, November 29, 2001, 48 DCR 11233).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-286, February 25, 2002, 49 DCR 2317).